browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4450 Y 1
SFX 4450 i lar i
SFX 3012 Y 1
SFX 3012 r ter r
SFX 4840 Y 1
SFX 4840 a dar a
SFX 3011 Y 1
SFX 3011 s ter s
SFX 601 Y 1
SFX 601 a der a
SFX 1462 Y 1
SFX 1462 r sa r
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 c der c
SFX 4164 Y 1
SFX 4164 n rmai n
SFX 4749 Y 1
SFX 4749 a ereschan a
SFX 3642 Y 1
SFX 3642 t vers t
SFX 2476 Y 1
SFX 2476 g schar g
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 a la a
SFX 1455 Y 1
SFX 1455 a ta a
SFX 4462 Y 1
SFX 4462 c la c
SFX 4461 Y 1
SFX 4461 d la d
SFX 2418 Y 1
SFX 2418 d ta d
SFX 4313 Y 1
SFX 4313 d nt d
SFX 4751 Y 1
SFX 4751 a eresch a
SFX 4569 Y 1
SFX 4569 a ifitgesch a
SFX 4877 Y 1
SFX 4877 a clava a
SFX 4119 Y 1
SFX 4119 n schar n
SFX 3095 Y 1
SFX 3095 n rmeschian n
SFX 2905 Y 1
SFX 2905 a um a
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 i la i
SFX 2862 Y 1
SFX 2862 t ziava t
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 i nt i
SFX 4697 Y 1
SFX 4697 a ettias a
SFX 3170 Y 1
SFX 3170 l ndias l
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 l nt l
SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 a iliescha a
SFX 4149 Y 1
SFX 4149 n rtader n
SFX 3974 Y 1
SFX 3974 n ta n
SFX 3887 Y 1
SFX 3887 r tivamain r
SFX 3139 Y 1
SFX 3139 m nt m
SFX 2861 Y 1
SFX 2861 t zieschan t
SFX 2699 Y 1
SFX 2699 a ficaziun a
SFX 1847 Y 1
SFX 1847 a ola a
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 c ficaziun c
SFX 2657 Y 1
SFX 2657 a idias a
SFX 2621 Y 1
SFX 2621 a ind a
SFX 2414 Y 1
SFX 2414 r ta r
SFX 1907 Y 1
SFX 1907 a iescha a
SFX 2081 Y 1
SFX 2081 s ta s
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 a escha a
SFX 2035 Y 1
SFX 2035 o um o
SFX 1158 Y 1
SFX 1158 a inassas a
SFX 3132 Y 1
SFX 3132 i ola i
SFX 2869 Y 1
SFX 2869 t ziassan t
SFX 2706 Y 1
SFX 2706 d escha d
SFX 1449 Y 1
SFX 1449 c tgads c
SFX 2333 Y 1
SFX 2333 r zza r
SFX 1078 Y 1
SFX 1078 a entava a
SFX 3131 Y 1
SFX 3131 n ola n
SFX 2133 Y 1
SFX 2133 a ot a
SFX 608 Y 1
SFX 608 a st a
SFX 1161 Y 1
SFX 1161 a inar a
SFX 1577 Y 1
SFX 1577 t zza t
SFX 635 Y 1
SFX 635 c st c
SFX 4565 Y 1
SFX 4565 a ifitgeschia a
SFX 3606 Y 1
SFX 3606 v zza v
SFX 4459 Y 1
SFX 4459 i ladas i
SFX 4115 Y 1
SFX 4115 g schassas g
SFX 2681 Y 1
SFX 2681 c gnassas c
SFX 3121 Y 1
SFX 3121 i ot i
SFX 1880 Y 1
SFX 1880 a iseschan a
SFX 4885 Y 1
SFX 4885 a clai a
SFX 2126 Y 1
SFX 2126 a sà a
SFX 1865 Y 1
SFX 1865 l ma l
SFX 1456 Y 1
SFX 1456 l st l
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 c sà c
SFX 3694 Y 1
SFX 3694 i unias i
SFX 4114 Y 1
SFX 4114 n schassas n
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 n st n
SFX 2902 Y 1
SFX 2902 a unar a
SFX 2421 Y 1
SFX 2421 r st r
SFX 4165 Y 1
SFX 4165 n rmads n
SFX 4580 Y 1
SFX 4580 a ifitgads a
SFX 3614 Y 1
SFX 3614 t ziunescha t
SFX 3130 Y 1
SFX 3130 a olog a
SFX 2122 Y 1
SFX 2122 a sads a
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 c sads c
SFX 2485 Y 1
SFX 2485 n sà n
SFX 2157 Y 1
SFX 2157 l ntads l
SFX 3706 Y 1
SFX 3706 i unar i
SFX 3350 Y 1
SFX 3350 a gia a
SFX 3339 Y 1
SFX 3339 c gnads c
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 t ziunar t
SFX 1446 Y 1
SFX 1446 c tgais c
SFX 4153 Y 1
SFX 4153 n rmond n
SFX 2676 Y 1
SFX 2676 c gnian c
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 a ra a
SFX 1313 Y 1
SFX 1313 a va a
SFX 4650 Y 1
SFX 4650 d gnian d
SFX 4562 Y 1
SFX 4562 a ifitgond a
SFX 973 Y 1
SFX 973 a egiassas a
SFX 3699 Y 1
SFX 3699 i unavas i
SFX 2876 Y 1
SFX 2876 d za d
SFX 2659 Y 1
SFX 2659 a idia a
SFX 2675 Y 1
SFX 2675 c gnond c
SFX 4166 Y 1
SFX 4166 n rmadas n
SFX 2490 Y 1
SFX 2490 n sads n
SFX 1887 Y 1
SFX 1887 a ineschan a
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 i va i
SFX 1259 Y 1
SFX 1259 i ra i
SFX 2100 Y 1
SFX 2100 a seschia a
SFX 2363 Y 1
SFX 2363 l va l
SFX 899 Y 1
SFX 899 l ra l
SFX 3937 Y 1
SFX 3937 s tger s
SFX 2130 Y 1
SFX 2130 m ra m
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 c seschia c
SFX 1123 Y 1
SFX 1123 n ra n
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 l ntias l
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 r va r
SFX 1580 Y 1
SFX 1580 s va s
SFX 3101 Y 1
SFX 3101 n rmais n
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 t za t
SFX 350 Y 1
SFX 350 t va t
SFX 4577 Y 1
SFX 4577 a ifitgais a
SFX 2119 Y 1
SFX 2119 a sais a
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 l ntavas l
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 c sais c
SFX 2462 Y 1
SFX 2462 n seschia n
SFX 2154 Y 1
SFX 2154 l ntais l
SFX 4657 Y 1
SFX 4657 a gna a
SFX 2685 Y 1
SFX 2685 c gnais c
SFX 981 Y 1
SFX 981 a egiada a
SFX 1388 Y 1
SFX 1388 c gna c
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 a etta a
SFX 3341 Y 1
SFX 3341 d gna d
SFX 1285 Y 1
SFX 1285 a iada a
SFX 3383 Y 1
SFX 3383 c etta c
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 a sassas a
SFX 4706 Y 1
SFX 4706 d etta d
SFX 4656 Y 1
SFX 4656 f gna f
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 c sassas c
SFX 2371 Y 1
SFX 2371 a usitad a
SFX 371 Y 1
SFX 371 a ic a
SFX 4139 Y 1
SFX 4139 c sader c
SFX 2487 Y 1
SFX 2487 n sais n
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 a sai a
SFX 4616 Y 1
SFX 4616 d ic d
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 c sai c
SFX 3324 Y 1
SFX 3324 e ic e
SFX 919 Y 1
SFX 919 a egias a
SFX 3981 Y 1
SFX 3981 c sts c
SFX 3618 Y 1
SFX 3618 t ziunavas t
SFX 3474 Y 1
SFX 3474 a clà a
SFX 2483 Y 1
SFX 2483 n sassas n
SFX 2134 Y 1
SFX 2134 a osa a
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 r tur r
SFX 3653 Y 1
SFX 3653 r ut r
SFX 2697 Y 1
SFX 2697 a fitgescha a
SFX 2489 Y 1
SFX 2489 n sai n
SFX 3980 Y 1
SFX 3980 l sts l
SFX 2254 Y 1
SFX 2254 c fitgescha c
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 n sts n
SFX 4138 Y 1
SFX 4138 r sai r
SFX 4698 Y 1
SFX 4698 a ettian a
SFX 3171 Y 1
SFX 3171 l ndian l
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 a idads a
SFX 2916 Y 1
SFX 2916 a ulaziun a
SFX 960 Y 1
SFX 960 a iras a
SFX 2230 Y 1
SFX 2230 a idian a
SFX 823 Y 1
SFX 823 i ntas i
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 a uleschas a
SFX 1263 Y 1
SFX 1263 l ntas l
SFX 2261 Y 1
SFX 2261 a fitgava a
SFX 3305 Y 1
SFX 3305 a idond a
SFX 1371 Y 1
SFX 1371 a issem a
SFX 1159 Y 1
SFX 1159 a inassan a
SFX 2260 Y 1
SFX 2260 c fitgava c
SFX 1902 Y 1
SFX 1902 a ieschias a
SFX 2493 Y 1
SFX 2493 l rt l
SFX 1832 Y 1
SFX 1832 n rt n
SFX 4352 Y 1
SFX 4352 l nc l
SFX 4147 Y 1
SFX 4147 p rt p
SFX 4157 Y 1
SFX 4157 n rmass n
SFX 4117 Y 1
SFX 4117 g schassan g
SFX 2682 Y 1
SFX 2682 c gnassan c
SFX 4575 Y 1
SFX 4575 a ifitgass a
SFX 4700 Y 1
SFX 4700 a ettais a
SFX 4348 Y 1
SFX 4348 l ndais l
SFX 3741 Y 1
SFX 3741 i unads i
SFX 2929 Y 1
SFX 2929 a ulada a
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 a usadad a
SFX 1052 Y 1
SFX 1052 a inada a
SFX 2680 Y 1
SFX 2680 c gnass c
SFX 2054 Y 1
SFX 2054 n tschas n
SFX 3695 Y 1
SFX 3695 i unian i
SFX 3323 Y 1
SFX 3323 a icher a
SFX 1132 Y 1
SFX 1132 a ologia a
SFX 4116 Y 1
SFX 4116 n schassan n
SFX 2664 Y 1
SFX 2664 a idais a
SFX 2964 Y 1
SFX 2964 r tschas r
SFX 3008 Y 1
SFX 3008 a tga a
SFX 3692 Y 1
SFX 3692 i unond i
SFX 2545 Y 1
SFX 2545 a ograf a
SFX 1279 Y 1
SFX 1279 a iar a
SFX 966 Y 1
SFX 966 a ier a
SFX 2599 Y 1
SFX 2599 a iv a
SFX 2269 Y 1
SFX 2269 a fitgar a
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 c tgond c
SFX 2268 Y 1
SFX 2268 c fitgar c
SFX 4280 Y 1
SFX 4280 n ologia n
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 a egiassan a
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 a unais a
SFX 3700 Y 1
SFX 3700 i unavan i
SFX 3942 Y 1
SFX 3942 n tga n
SFX 1820 Y 1
SFX 1820 r tga r
SFX 1237 Y 1
SFX 1237 s tga s
SFX 2127 Y 1
SFX 2127 n rtas n
SFX 3735 Y 1
SFX 3735 i unais i
SFX 3328 Y 1
SFX 3328 a ibel a
SFX 3758 Y 1
SFX 3758 o udida o
SFX 2146 Y 1
SFX 2146 l ntian l
SFX 4033 Y 1
SFX 4033 n situr n
SFX 2290 Y 1
SFX 2290 a etschia a
SFX 2092 Y 1
SFX 2092 a sond a
SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 c sond c
SFX 4163 Y 1
SFX 4163 n rmain n
SFX 3865 Y 1
SFX 3865 s to s
SFX 2144 Y 1
SFX 2144 l ntond l
SFX 4578 Y 1
SFX 4578 a ifitgain a
SFX 2731 Y 1
SFX 2731 a entschas a
SFX 2149 Y 1
SFX 2149 l ntavan l
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 c tgescha c
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 l ntain l
SFX 2686 Y 1
SFX 2686 c gnain c
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 a eras a
SFX 2494 Y 1
SFX 2494 n rtias n
SFX 2116 Y 1
SFX 2116 a sassan a
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 l tta l
SFX 2456 Y 1
SFX 2456 n sond n
SFX 1797 Y 1
SFX 1797 n tta n
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 c sassan c
SFX 1540 Y 1
SFX 1540 a isar a
SFX 852 Y 1
SFX 852 r tta r
SFX 1586 Y 1
SFX 1586 s tta s
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 a egian a
SFX 3703 Y 1
SFX 3703 i unassas i
SFX 1383 Y 1
SFX 1383 a iassas a
SFX 3619 Y 1
SFX 3619 t ziunavan t
SFX 3437 Y 1
SFX 3437 a egiant a
SFX 3318 Y 1
SFX 3318 a idass a
SFX 2484 Y 1
SFX 2484 n sassan n
SFX 1281 Y 1
SFX 1281 a iala a
SFX 4131 Y 1
SFX 4131 n schads n
SFX 1088 Y 1
SFX 1088 a entadas a
SFX 867 Y 1
SFX 867 a ica a
SFX 4083 Y 1
SFX 4083 g schias g
SFX 2683 Y 1
SFX 2683 c gnas c
SFX 2912 Y 1
SFX 2912 a uleschan a
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 a egl a
SFX 813 Y 1
SFX 813 l schias l
SFX 1640 Y 1
SFX 1640 l ntan l
