browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
affin/64,4153,4160,4161,4165,4166
appret/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,192,2338,2854,2855,2856,2857,2858,2859,2860,2861,2862,2863,2864,2865,2867,2868,2869,2870,2871,2872,2873,3630,3631
camea/69
classa/1,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,87,89,90,91,92,93,111,112,371,867,3302,3323,4562,4563,4564,4565,4566,4567,4568,4569,4570,4571,4572,4573,4574,4575,4576,4577,4578,4579,4580,4582,4583,4584
different/1,3,5,81,96,735,1311,2338,2339,2854,2862,2863,2864,2865,2867,2868,2869,2870,2871,2872,2873,3630,3631
direct/1,3,5,81,86,98,132,135,162,178,181,192,196,400,473,671,957,1637,1773,2000,2337,2772
domino/2035
dubi/1,98,291,883,1489,1783,3229,3233,4402,4445,4446,4448,4449,4450,4452,4453,4454,4455,4456,4459,4460
empatg/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,2109,2470,2473,2474,2475,2476,4080,4083,4084,4109,4111,4115,4117,4121,4125,4127,4129,4130,4134
feminin/3,5,1344,1604,2118,2124,2423,2456,2479,2480,2483,2484,2485,2487,2488,2490,2491,3063
fera/66,4840
fess/5,105,2081,3969
frar/1,102,1462,2424
identic/1,3,2246,2256,2258,2263,2265,2268,2270,2272,2276,2278,2280,2282,2285,2417
l'aur/193,3012
magi/5,57,105,181,203,235,393,627,925,1114,3046,3121
mazza/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,53,62,63,87,364,1566,2133,4356,4408
m'empatg/6,33,36,37,2470,2473,2474,2476
m'identifitgar/21
mulai/1,2,165,1828,2090,2361,2362,2366,2447
mumia/2247,2269,2277,2283,2699
musica/1,75,77,79,156,172,262,321,358,467,1132,2200,2604,3130
muss/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,141,153,426,1101,1237,1598,1969,3011,3419,3549,3936
nubic/3,4462
optimai/1,2,881,1489,2090,2361,2362,2447
opulent/5,96
ordinar/20,21,25,26,28,29,46,184,193,740,2414
Plan/1,60,134,376,1418,3974
prim/3,77,177,183,200,1098,1207,1368,1872,1927,3139
proced/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,57,71,72,73,74,86,135,145,147,148,149,152,192,534,671,4313
prognostic/5,83,221,1431,1439,1440,1443,1444,1445,1446,1447,1449,1450,1451,1452
prosperai/1,2,108,236,2090,2361,2362,2447
quel/1,77,79,156,1456,1605,2426,3980
reverend/5,95,626,2876
riend/9,2418
ritmic/5,256,258,259,267,285
Salata/1455
sbrajat/60,82,138,140,142,150,157,158,159,160,161,163,164,166,167,168,169,170,171,173,175,1577
scala/66,107,2743,3350
schluc/260,2684,3339
schnec/2770,3447
scod/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,57,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,3341,4649,4650,4651,4653,4655
scud/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,57,70,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,191,672,2294,2295,2702,2703,2704,2705,2706,4461,4683,4706
septa/364,1847,2905
s'extingua/2,45,63,536,2182,2202,2621
sfid/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,141,4461,4683
sfranzla/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,89,90,91,92,111,112,174,873,919,920,921,922,969,970,971,972,973,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981
sigl/1,5,72,1865,4232
simpatic/98,256,258,259,267,285
simpla/1,65,76,3302,4562,4570,4571,4572,4573,4574,4575,4576,4577,4578,4579,4580,4582,4583,4584
sisti/1,2,11,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,61,3132
sofistic/5,34,95,1431,1439,1440,1441,1442,1443,1444,1445,1446,1447,1448,1449,1450,1451,1452
spol/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,70,188,435,899,1353,1456,1459,1605,1640,1642,2089,2091,2426,2448,2493,3044,3087,3142,3170,3171,3172,3182,4344
statua/608
Stria/1,186,322,2902,3421,3744
stria/625,1847,3421
stun/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,1839,4079,4108,4110,4112,4113,4114,4116,4119,4122,4124,4126,4128,4131,4132,4133,4201
surzinada/1,45,69
sutnev/3606
suttasta/1,9,10,11,12,15,22,24,47,56,255,263,287,293,305,311,312,1798,4697,4698,4699
t'affa/1,11,815,818,2288,4549,4550
tgir/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,141,144,368,426,672,852,986,1131,1209,1462,1969,2333,4138
tinta/1053,1154,1161,1165
tractanda/89,90,91,92,93,111,112
Trin/64,650
truc/77,156,203,635,1487,3330,3981,4664
tschel/1,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,77,156,407,704,899,1263,1459,1640,1850,1851,1852,2089,2091,2144,2145,2146,2147,2148,2149,2150,2151,2152,2153,2154,2155,2156,2157,2158,2448,2493,3087
victoria/1831,2126
